Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 16
MOTOR VEHICLE CARRIERS EXEMPT FROM
REGULATION AS PUBLIC UTILITIES

40-16-101 to 40-16-111. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article repealed, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1985. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2011, consult the 2010 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning carriers that are not public utilities, see article 10.1 of this title.